Vermont, session 2025-2026, H652.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Lake Memphremagog is of integral importance to Vermont and
Quebec as the lake:
(A) is the largest body of water in northeastern Vermont and
southeastern Quebec;
(B) provides over 175,000 individuals with drinking water in the
municipalities of Sherbrooke, Magog, Potton, and Saint-Benoît-du-Lac;
(C) is an important economic driver in northeastern Vermont and
southeastern Canada, drawing individuals and resources for its beautiful
landscapes and numerous recreational opportunities; and
(D) is a precious natural resource and habitat for fish and wildlife.
(2) Vermont environmental agencies need to take on a greater role in the
oversight and restriction of discharges that may cause impairments to northerly
flowing Lake Memphremagog as more than 100 permanent or intermittent
tributaries feed the Lake, including the Black River in Coventry, with 71
percent of the watershed located in Vermont.
(3) Prior to the issuance of the Act 250 permit to New England Waste
Services of Vermont in 2019 prohibiting the disposal of landfill leachate in the
Lake Memphremagog watershed, 15,000 gallons per day of toxic landfill
VT LEG #385582 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.652
2026 Page 3 of 6
leachate were disposed of, untreated for perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl
substances (PFAS), in Newport’s wastewater treatment facility.
(4) Current leachate treatment systems are incapable of removing all
hazardous PFAS from leachate. Therefore, Lake Memphremagog must be
protected from chemically contaminated discharges into the lake and
watershed that are proven to be harmful to human and environmental health.
(5) PFAS contamination of Lake Memphremagog’s waters has been
identified in numerous reports by the Agency of Natural Resources (ANR), the
Department of Fish and Wildlife, and others; for example, in an ANR study
entitled 2021 Vermont Per- and Polyfluoroalkyl Substances (PFAS) Surface
Water, Fish Tissue, and Wastewater Treatment Facility Effluent Monitoring
Report, Lake Memphremagog measured highest of all surface waters sampled
or analyzed for perfluorooctanesulfonic acid (PFOS), at 2.8 parts per trillion
(ppt) at mid-lake, which is 70 percent of the maximum contaminant level of 4
ppt for PFOS.
(6) In the ANR study in the Vermont Per- and Polyfluoroalkyl
Substances (PFAS) Surface Water, Fish Tissue, and Wastewater Treatment
Facility Effluent Monitoring Report:
(A) four species of fish in Lake Memphremagog that were sampled
and analyzed for hazardous PFOS measured equivalent to 1,000 ppt; and
VT LEG #385582 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.652
2026 Page 4 of 6
(B) the City of Newport’s wastewater treatment facility measured
higher for PFAS than any other Vermont wastewater treatment facility
sampled and analyzed in the study.
(7) In the 2020 U.S. Geological Survey (USGS) publication Malignant
Melanoma of Brown Bullhead (Ameiurus nebulosus) in Lake Memphremagog,
Vermont Quebec, the USGS found a prevalence of 30 percent of adult brown
bullhead had malignant melanoma. Cancerous brown bullheads are found in
no other waterbodies in Vermont.
(8) PFAS chemicals are proven to accumulate in the environment
and bioaccumulate in organisms, including in humans.
(9) PFAS chemicals are proven to cause harmful health effects,
including up to 10 types of cancers; endocrine disruption leading to problems
with reproduction, development, and metabolism; hypertension; and numerous
other serious health impairments.
(10) As more PFAS chemicals enter the groundwater and surface water
system of the Lake Memphremagog watershed, levels of these chemicals will
increase, lasting for decades and longer.
(11) To address the environmental and public health concerns posed by
the disposal of PFAS to the waters of Vermont, the State should permanently
prohibit the discharge of landfill leachate, treated or untreated, anywhere in the
Lake Memphremagog watershed, either by direct discharge into the watershed,
VT LEG #385582 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.652
2026 Page 5 of 6
or by discharge into a wastewater treatment facility that discharges into the
Lake Memphremagog watershed.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 1259 is amended to read:
§ 1259. PROHIBITIONS
(a) No person shall discharge any waste, substance, or material into waters
of the State, nor shall any person discharge any waste, substance, or material
into an injection well or discharge into a publicly owned treatment works any
waste that interferes with, passes through without treatment, or is otherwise
incompatible with those works or would have a substantial adverse effect on
those works or on water quality, without first obtaining a permit for that
discharge from the Secretary. This subsection shall not prohibit the proper
application of fertilizer to fields and crops, nor reduce or affect the authority or
policy declared in Joint House Resolution 7 of the 1971 Session of the General
Assembly.
* * *
(j) No person shall discharge waste from hydraulic fracturing, as that term
is defined in 29 V.S.A. § 503, into or from a pollution abatement facility, as
that term is defined in section 1278 of this title.
(k)(1) No person shall discharge leachate from a landfill or a solid waste
management facility into a water within the Lake Memphremagog watershed
regardless of whether the leachate has been treated or is untreated. The
VT LEG #385582 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.652
2026 Page 6 of 6
prohibition on the discharge of PFAS into a water within the Lake
Memphremagog watershed includes the prohibition on direct discharges from a
landfill or solid waste management facility and the prohibition on the transfer
of the leachate to a wastewater treatment facility in Vermont for subsequent
discharge into a water within the Lake Memphremagog watershed.
(2) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Landfill” has the same meaning as “sanitary landfill” in section
6602 of this title.
(B) “Solid waste management facility” has the same meaning as
“facility” in section 6602 of this title.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385582 v.1